src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON мн._[с_a2]
+N+Neu: аPlStem_ов ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON мн._[с_a[2]]
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов%^G # ;

LEXICON с_a-
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_Prb ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b_Р._мн._затрудн.
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_gPrb ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b_OCS_ие
+N+Neu: NSgEnd_OCS_ие ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_OCS_ие ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b12
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: ыPlEnd_ов ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b12-
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: ыPlEnd_ов_Prb ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b2
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_ов ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b[2]
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>о́в%^G # ;

LEXICON мн._[с_b]
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b-
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_Prb ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b-_w/Loc_и́//е́
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Gen:%>а́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc+Fac:%>е́%^G # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Loc:%>и́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Dat:%>у́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Sg+Ins:%>о́м # ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_Prb ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b-_GenPlokay
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_Prb ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_b-_OCS_ие
+N+Neu: NSgEnd_OCS_ие ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_OCS_ие_Prb ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON NSgEnd_OCS_ие
+Inan+Sg+Nom:ие́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:ие́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Gen:ия́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc:ии́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat:ию́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins:ие́м # ;

! LEXICON аPlEnd_OCS_ие
! +Inan+Pl+Nom:ия́ # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:ия́ # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Gen:и́й # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Loc:ия́х # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Dat:ия́м # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Ins:ия́ми # ;

! LEXICON аPlEnd_OCS_ие_Prb
! +Inan+Pl+Nom+Prb:ия́ # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:ия́ # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Gen+Prb:и́й # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Loc+Prb:ия́х # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Dat+Prb:ия́м # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Ins+Prb:ия́ми # ;

LEXICON с_c
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_c_судно
+N+Neu:но NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON мн._[с_c]
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_c_есаPl
+N+Neu:о NSgStem ;
+N+Neu:е́са́ аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_c2
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_ов ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_c[2]
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>о́в%^G # ;

LEXICON с_c-
+N+Neu: NSgStem ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_d
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_d_JPl
+N+Neu:о́ NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu:%^Fей аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_d_дно
+N+Neu:д%^Fо́но́ NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu:до́н%^Fей аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_d_гумно
+N+Neu:%^Fено́ NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu:%^Fено́ аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%^Fёно́%>ов # ;

LEXICON с_d1-
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: ыPlStem_Prb ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_d2
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_ов ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_d[2]
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов%^G # ;

LEXICON с_d-
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_Prb ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_e_око
+N+Neu:о́ко NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu:о́ч ыPlAnom ;

LEXICON с_e_ухо
+N+Neu:у́хо NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu:у́ш ыPlAnom ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_f
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: аPlAnom ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_f1_плечо
+N+Neu: NSgEnd ;
+N+Neu: ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Neu: ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Neu+Inan+Pl+Gen:%> # ;
+N+Neu: PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON с_[п_b]
+N+Neu: NSg_SubstAdj_End ;
+N+Neu: Pl_SubstAdj_End ;

LEXICON с_[мс_a]
+N+Neu: Noun_мс-п_a_Neu_inan ;
+N+Neu: Noun_мс-п_a_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON с_[мс_b]
+N+Neu: Noun_мс-п_b_Neu_inan ;
+N+Neu: Noun_мс-п_b_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON со_порося
+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Nom: # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Acc: # ;

LEXICON со_теля
со_порося ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Dat:ти # ;

LEXICON со_0
+N+Neu: Indecl_Sg_anim ;
+N+Neu: Indecl_Pl_anim ;

LEXICON со_a
+N+Neu: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_anim ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON со_[со_a]
со_a ;

LEXICON со_a1
+N+Neu: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Neu: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON со_a1[2]
+N+Neu: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Neu: ыPlStem_anim ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов%^G # ;

LEXICON со_дитя
+N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Nom:дитя́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Acc:дитя́ # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Gen:дитя́ти # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Loc:дитя́ти # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Dat:дитя́ти # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Sg+Ins:дитя́тей # ;
+N+Neu:де́ть ыPlNomStem_anim ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Acc:дете́й # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Gen:дете́й # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Loc:де́тях # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Dat:де́тям # ;
! +N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Ins:детьми́ # ;

LEXICON мо_[со_a1]
+N+Msc: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim ;

LEXICON мо_[со_a1]_4
мо_[со_a1] ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc+Fac:%>у # ;

LEXICON мо_[со_a[1]]
+N+Msc: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: аPlStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlStem_anim_Fac ;

LEXICON мо_[со_a[1]]_4
мо_[со_a[1]] ;
! +N+Msc+Anim+Sg+Acc+Fac:%>у # ;

LEXICON со_a2
+N+Neu: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_anim_ов ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON со_a[2]
+N+Neu: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_anim ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'
! +N+Neu+Anim+Pl+Gen+Fac:%>ов%^G # ;

LEXICON мо_[со_a2]
+N+Msc: NSgStem_anim ;
+N+Msc: аPlStem_anim_ов ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON мн._[со_a]
+N+Neu: аPlStem_anim ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON со_b
+N+Neu: NSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Neu: аPlEnd_anim ;      !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON мо_[со_b12]
+N+Msc: NSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim_ов ;

LEXICON со_b12-
+N+Neu: NSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Neu: ыPlEnd_anim_ов_Prb ;

LEXICON мо_[со_b12-]
+N+Msc: NSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Msc: ыPlEnd_anim_ов_Prb ;

LEXICON со_d
+N+Neu: NSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_anim ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON со_d-
+N+Neu: NSgEnd_anim ;
+N+Neu: аPlStem_anim_Prb ;     !Cyrillic 'а' in 'аPl'

LEXICON с_[п_a]
+N+Neu: NSg_SubstAdj_Stem ;
+N+Neu: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem ;

LEXICON со_[п_a]
+N+Neu: NSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;
+N+Neu: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim ;

LEXICON со_[п_a_R]
+N+Neu: NSg_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R ;
+N+Neu: Pl_SubstAdj_Stem_anim_R ;

LEXICON с_8a_ё_-ёна,_-ён,_-ёнам
+N+Neu: мяSg ;
+N+Neu:ёно аPlStem ;

LEXICON с_8c_ё
+N+Neu: мяSg ;
+N+Neu: мяPl_ё ;

LEXICON с_8c-_ё
+N+Neu: мяSg ;
+N+Neu: мяPl_ё_Prb ;

LEXICON с_8c_я́
+N+Neu: мяSg ;
+N+Neu: мяPl_я́ ;

LEXICON мяSg
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>я # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>я # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Gen:%>ени # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Loc:%>ени # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Dat:%>ени # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Ins:%>енем # ;

LEXICON мяPl_ё
:%>ен аPlNomEnd ;
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ена́ # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Gen:%>ён # ;
:%>ен PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON мяPl_ё_Prb
:%>ен аPlNomEnd_Prb ;
! +Inan+Pl+Acc+Prb:%>ена́ # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Gen+Prb:%>ён # ;
:%>ен PlPeriphEnd_Prb ;

LEXICON мяPl_я́
:%>ен аPlNomEnd ;
! +Inan+Pl+Acc:%>ена́ # ;
! +Inan+Pl+Gen:%>я́н # ;
:%>ен PlPeriphEnd ;

LEXICON NSgStem
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
MSgObliqStem ;

LEXICON NSgStem_anim
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>о # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>о # ;
MSgObliqStem_anim ;

LEXICON NSgEnd
+Inan+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
! +Inan+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
MSgObliqEnd ;

LEXICON NSgEnd_anim
+Anim+Sg+Nom:%>о́ # ;
! +Anim+Sg+Acc:%>о́ # ;
MSgObliqEnd_anim ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!FEMININE PARADIGMS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON ж_0
+N+Fem: Indecl_Sg_inan ;
+N+Fem: Indecl_Pl_inan ;

LEXICON ж_a
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON ж_a_GPlь
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_ь ;

LEXICON ж_a_Р._мн._нет
+N+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Fem: ыPlStem_gPrb ;

LEXICON соб-ж_a
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON соб-мн._[ж_a]
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON соб-ж_a?
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: FSgStem ;
+N+Prop+Sem/Alt+Fem: ыPlStem_gPrb ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_a]_3
мн._[ж_a] ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_a]
+N+Fem: ыPlStem ;

LEXICON мн._[ж_a]_хлопоты
+N+Fem:ота ыPlNomStem ;
+N+Fem:ота ыPlAccStem ;
! +N+Fem+Inan+Pl+Gen:о́т # ;
+N+Fem:ота PlPeriphStem ;
