src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Noun
афгани:афгани́ ж_0 ;
стоматология:стоматоло́гия ж_a "weight: 3.0859244446606486" ;
райя:ра́йя ж_a_Р._мн._нет ;
кормокухня:ко̀рмоку́х%^Fоня ж_a_GPlь ;
нарты:на́рта мн._[ж_a] ;
бачки:ба́ч%^Fека мн._[ж_a]_3 ;
хлопоты:хло́п мн._[ж_a]_хлопоты "weight: 4.280194687901523" ;
каменья:каме́н%^Fийе мн._[с_a2] ;
охлопья:охло́п%^Fийе мн._[с_a2] ;
кружевца:кру́жев%^Fеце мн._[с_a[2]] ;
рамена:раме́но́ мн._[с_b] ;
чудеса:чуде́со́ мн._[с_b] ;
кружева:кру́жево́ мн._[с_c] ;
княжата:княжа́то мн._[со_a] ;
ребята:ребя́то мн._[со_a] "weight: 5.404635891703243" ;
идолище:и́долище мо_[со_a1] ;
соловейко:солове́й%^Fеко мо_[со_a1] ;
парнище:парни́ще мо_[со_a1]_4 ;
дурачище:дурачи́ще мо_[со_a1]_4 ;
полудурье:полуду́р%^Fийе мо_[со_a2] ;
прилипало:прилипа́ло мо_[со_a[1]] "weight: 3.4676599491383264" ;
сверлило:сверли́ло мо_[со_a[1]] "weight: 3.0640448756318226" ;
медведище:медве́дище мо_[со_a[1]]_4 ;
карько:карь%^Fо́ко́ мо_[со_b12] ;
мазло:мазло́ мо_[со_b12-] ;
знамя:зна́м с_8a_ё_-ёна,_-ён,_-ёнам "weight: 4.4400619240222525" ;
имя:и́м с_8c_ё "weight: 5.510243030124084" ;
темя:те́м с_8c-_ё "weight: 3.2642373155188733" ;
третье:тре́т%^Fий с_[мс_a] ;
своё:сво́й с_[мс_b] ;
потогонное:потого́нн с_[п_a] ;
пожилое:пожил с_[п_b] ;
спиртное:спиртн с_[п_b] ;
млеко:мле́ко с_a- ;
лето:ле́то с_a- "weight: 5.114947958394213" ;
торжество:торже́ство́ с_b "weight: 4.3386092970019945" ;
кружевцо:кружев%^Fе́цо́ с_b ;
пальтецо:пальте́цо́ с_b_Р._мн._затрудн. ;
копьецо:копье́цо́ с_b_Р._мн._затрудн. ;
житие:жит с_b_OCS_ие "weight: 3.216936323825264" ;
питие:пит с_b_OCS_ие ;
зло:з%^Fо́ло с_b-_GenPlokay "weight: 4.8726939186306995" ;
полуочко:полуо́чко́ с_b12 ;
брюшко:брю́шко́ с_b12 "weight: 3.612045887250756" ;
мяско:мяско́ с_b12- ;
молочко:молочко́ с_b12- "weight: 3.501726244713033" ;
остриё:остри́ё с_b2 ;
деревцо:дерев%^Fе́цо́ с_b[2] "weight: 3.90982279213314" ;
старьё:стар%^Fе́йё с_b- ;
шитво:ши́тво́ с_b- ;
забытьё:забыт%^Fе́йё с_b-_w/Loc_и́//е́ ;
полузабытьё:полузабыт%^Fе́йё с_b-_w/Loc_и́//е́ ;
небытие:небыт с_b-_OCS_ие "weight: 3.8962774371284215" ;
стадо:ста́до с_c "weight: 4.484872400560446" ;
макротело:ма̀кроте́ло с_c ;
небо:не́б с_c_есаPl "weight: 5.459898183671168" ;
судно:су́д с_c_судно "weight: 4.603480940144209" ;
чудо:чу́д с_c_есаPl "weight: 5.033927474305058" ; ! [поэтич._также_с_1a]
облако:о́блако с_c2 "weight: 4.818158965189907" ;
облачко:о́блачко с_c2 "weight: 4.000919876064908" ;
деревце:де́рев%^Fе́це с_c[2] ;
сено:се́но с_c- "weight: 4.526263523487125" ;
мясо:мя́со с_c- "weight: 4.926150879223313" ;
клеймо:кле́ймо́ с_d "weight: 3.661061027625043" ;
берцо:бёр%^Fецо́ с_d ;
гумно:гу́м с_d_гумно "weight: 3.3648483817939754" ;
дно: с_d_дно "weight: 4.982404607011636" ;
звено:зве́н с_d_JPl "weight: 4.189219154460882" ;
перо:пе́р с_d_JPl "weight: 4.693925044390152" ;
молоко:моло́ко́ с_d1- "weight: 4.8615109457667085" ;
жнивьё:жни́в%^Fийё с_d2 ;
решетцо:решёт%^Fецо́ с_d[2] ;
долотцо:доло́т%^Fецо́ с_d[2] ;
дерьмо:де́рьмо́ с_d- "weight: 4.399865326407253" ;
пшено:пшёно́ с_d- "weight: 3.3417954347442382" ;
око: с_e_око "weight: 4.303219365231495" ;
ухо: с_e_ухо "weight: 5.397475266666886" ;
тавро:та́вро́ с_f ;
крыльцо:кры́ль%^Fе́цо́ с_f "weight: 4.780251329831071" ;
плечо:пле́чо́ с_f1_плечо "weight: 5.584821432852248" ;
пакибытие:па̀кибыт с_b-_OCS_ие ;
льносемя:льно̀се́м с_8c_я́ ;
тамагочи:тамаго́чи со_0 ;
животное:живо́тн со_[п_a] ;
пресмыкающееся:пресмыка́ющ со_[п_a_R] ;
ладо:ла́до со_[со_a] "weight: 3.9321759681884876" ;
чудище:чу́дище со_a "weight: 3.5421098682728367" ;
детище:де́тище со_a "weight: 3.649558940047992" ;
чмо:чмо́ со_0 ;
чадочко:ча́доч%^Fеко со_a1 ;
солнышко:со́лныш%^Fеко со_a1 "weight: 4.267506050874019" ;
золотко:зо́лот%^Fоко со_a1[2] ;
полудурье:полуду́р%^Fийе со_a2 ;
золотце:зо́лот%^Fеце со_a[2] ;
существо:суще́ство́ со_b "weight: 4.966359719916631" ;
мазло:ма́зло́ со_b12- ;
хамло:ха́мло́ со_b12- ;
юрлицо:ю̀рли́цо́ со_d ;
трепло:трёпло́ со_d- "weight: 3.329793225321471" ;
порося:порося́ со_порося ;
дитя: со_дитя "weight: 4.231652442950546" ;
теля:теля́ со_теля ;
